California, session 20252026, AB1599.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14113 is added to the Government Code, to read:14113. On or before December 31, 2026, June 1, 2027, the department shall create the California Transit Stop Registry, which shall be a centralized, statewide dataset of standardized information regarding transit stops that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following for each transit stop in the state:(a) The transit stop’s name.(b) The transit stop’s location.(c) The amenities available at the transit stop.(d) A unique identifier for the transit stop, as established by the department.SEC. 2. Section 99150.5 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:99150.5. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “California Transit Stop Registry” means the dataset described in Section 14113 of the Government Code.(2)“Transit district” means an entity that qualifies as a claimant, as defined in Section 99203, eligible to receive allocations under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200).(2) “Transit operator” has the same meaning as the term “operator” as defined in Section 99210.(3) “Unique identifier” means the unique identifier described in subdivision (d) of Section 14113 of the Government Code.(b) On or before June 1, 2027, January 1, 2028, a transit district operator shall do both of the following:(1) Ensure that the name and location of each of its transit stops conforms with the corresponding name and location identified in the California Transit Stop Registry.(2) Use the unique identifier that conforms with the California Transit Stop Registry when publishing any dataset with stop information, including, but not limited to, General Transit Feed Specification datasets, transit stop amenity datasets, stop-level ridership datasets, or any other format used to incorporate transit service information to a generally available trip-planning mobile application, or during publication of agency open datasets.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.